Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-3103
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the School Safety and Security Reporting System Act:

(1) Concerning behavior includes, but is not limited to, suicide, bullying, stalking behavior, cyber or electronic harassment, bomb threat, family violence, physical or sexual abuse, threat to property, behavior indicative of terrorism, assault or attack, inappropriate weapons use, concern about mental health or substance use, sexual exploitation or predation, and any direct or indirect threatening statement;

(2) Department means the State Department of Education or the state school security director;

(3) Mental health professional means a school psychologist, social worker, or licensed mental health professional;

(4) Report line staff means the staff of the Safe2HelpNE report line as provided in subsection (4) of section 79-3104;

(5) Safe2HelpNE report line means the reporting system established pursuant to section 79-3104;

(6) Threat assessment means an evidence-based process to reduce potential risks and incidents of violence resulting in harm to one or more persons or school property; and

(7) Threat assessment team means a school-based team of at least five members who have completed the training required pursuant to section 79-3105 and includes, but is not limited to, the principal or principal's designee, a mental health professional, and a member of the school staff.

Laws 2021, LB322, § 3.